ninfl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<Nom%>

%<Num%:Sg%>
%<Num%:Pl%>

%<Poss%:No%>
%<Poss%:1s%>
%<Poss%:2s%>
%<Poss%:3s%>
%<Poss%:1p%>
%<Poss%:2p%>
%<Poss%:3p%>


%<Fam%>

%<Case%:Nom%>
%<Case%:Dat%>
%<Case%:Loc%>
%<Case%:Acc%>
%<Case%:Abl%>
%<Case%:Gen%>
%<Case%:Ins%>

%(y%)
%(n%)
%(s%)
%(%{I%}%)
%{I%}
%{A%}
%(i%)

!(d|n)
%{N%}
%{N%}
%<PRED%>
%<NOMP%>


LEXICON Nom'_CAT 

%<NOM%>: Nom';

LEXICON Nomp'_CAT 

%<NOMP%>: Nom';

LEXICON Nom'

%<Num%:Sg%>:%- Sg ;
%<Num%:Pl%>:%-l%{A%}r Pl ;
Nom ;
%<AsIf%>:%-c%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON Nomp'

%<Num%:Sg%>:%- Sg ;
%<Num%:Pl%>:%-l%{A%}r Pl ;
Nomp ;
%<AsIf%>:%-c%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON Sg

%<Poss%:No%>:%- Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:1s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m Poss1;
%<Poss%:2s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:No%>:%- Poss2 ;
%<Poss%:1s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m Poss2 ;
%<Poss%:2s%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Poss2 ;
%<Poss%:3s%>:%-%(s%)%{I%}%(n%) Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:1p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)m%{I%}z Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:2p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n%{I%}z Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:2p%>:%-%(%{I%}%)z Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r%{I%}%(n%) Poss1 ;

LEXICON Pl

%<Poss%:No%>:%- Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:1s%>:%-%{I%}m Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:2s%>:%-%{I%}n Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:3s%>:%-%{I%}%(n%) Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:1p%>:%-%{I%}m%{I%}z Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:2p%>:%-%{I%}n%{I%}z Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:2p%>:%-%{I%}z Poss1 ;
%<Poss%:3p%>:%-%{I%}%(n%) Poss1 ;



LEXICON Poss2

%<Fam%>:%-l%{A%}r Fam ;
Fam ;



LEXICON Poss1

%<Fam%>:%-gil Fam ;
%<Fam%>:%-gillər Fam ;
Fam;

LEXICON Fam

%<Case%:Nom%>:%- Case1 ;
%<Case%:Dat%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} Case1 ;
%<Case%:Loc%>:%-d%{A%} Case2 ;
%<Case%:Acc%>:%-%(n%)%{I%} Case3 ;
%<Case%:Abl%>:%-d%{A%}n Case1 ;
%<Case%:Gen%>:%-%(n%)%{I%}n Case2 ;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}n%{A%}n Case1 ;
%<Case%:Ins%>:%-%(i%)l%{A%} Case1 ;
%<Case%:Nom%>%<Equ%>:%-%-c%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON Case1

# ;
CaseDeriv ;
%<PRED%>: pred;

LEXICON Case2

# ;
CaseDeriv ;
Case2Deriv ;
%<PRED%>: pred;

LEXICON Case3

# ;
